Massachusetts, session 194th, H800.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  Chapter 10 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 35W the following new section:— 
Section 35X. There is hereby established on the books of the commonwealth a separate 
fund known as the Polling Location Accessibility Fund, to promote improved involvement in the 
electoral process by physically-challenged and elderly individuals. Said fund shall consist of all 
monies appropriated therefore in each fiscal year and any funds donated to the commonwealth 
and designated for this purpose. All monies appropriated to said fund shall be made available for 
distribution upon appropriation. 

of 3 9  All revenues credited under this section shall remain in said Polling Location 
Accessibility Fund to assist cities and towns of the commonwealth in paying all or part of any 
costs associated with local initiatives to improve the physical condition of polling locations that 
may contain obstacles to access, or impediments to movement for elderly and physically-
challenged residents wishing to vote. Said fund may also be distributed to fund all or part of the 
costs associated with programs designed to increase the number of overall percentage of elderly 
and physically-challenged voters casting ballots at a state or federal election. All grants from this 
fund shall be made on a competitive basis pursuant to rules and regulations published by the 
office of the state secretary and all monetary awards shall be granted only at the discretion of the 
state secretary. 
The state treasurer shall deposit the fund in such a manner that will secure the highest 
interest rate available consistent with the safety of the fund and the requirement that all amounts 
on deposit be available for immediate withdrawal. All monies appropriated to said fund but 
unexpended at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain 
designated within said fund and be available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years for use 
consistent with this section. The fund shall be expended only for the purposes herein stated at the 
direction of the state secretary. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 54 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 10 the following new section: —Section 10A: The state secretary is hereby authorized 
and directed to establish a grant program for the purpose of assisting cities and towns in paying 
all or part of any costs associated with local initiatives to improve the physical condition of 
polling locations that may contain obstacles to access, or impediments to movement for elderly 
and physically-challenged residents wishing to vote. Grants made pursuant to this section shall 

of 3 32 include but not be limited to the substantial alteration and remodeling of a polling location for 
the specific purpose of better accommodating elderly and physically-challenged residents 
exercising their right to vote on election day. The state secretary may also make grants to 
increase the number or overall percentage of elderly and physically-challenged voters casting 
ballots at a state or federal election. All grants from this fund shall be made on a competitive 
basis pursuant to rules and regulations published by the office of the state secretary and all 
monetary awards shall be granted only at the discretion of the state secretary subject to available 
appropriations in the Polling Location Accessibility Fund established pursuant to section 35R of 
chapter 10 of the General Laws.